Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1125.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 32AUTOMATED LICENSE PLATE READER SYSTEMSSec.3201. Purpose.3202. Definitions.3203. Permits.§ 3201. Purpose.The purpose of this chapter is to establish a system for the issuance of permits for automated license plate readers on trafficways.§ 3202. Definitions.123456789101112131415161718 The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Automated license plate reader system." A system of one or more mobile cameras, combined with computer algorithms, to convert images of registration plates and vehicles into computer-readable data for law enforcement and public safety purposes. For the purposes of this section, automated license plate reader systems do not refer to electronic devices used solely for traffic violations or tolling purposes."Breakaway poles." Crash-tested poles that:(1) Support automated license plate reader system infrastructure.(2) Meet the uniform guidelines established by the American Association of State Highway and Transportation Officials.(3) Yield upon impact."Department." The Department of Transportation of the Commonwealth."Highway rights-of-way." The State and interstate highway systems maintained by the department."Law enforcement agency." As defined in 44 Pa.C.S. § 7202 (relating to definitions)."Political subdivision." As defined in section 9004.1(e) (relating to political subdivision and volunteer service use of tax-free motor fuels) . § 3203. Permits. (a) Installation.--The department shall have the power and duty to permit the installation of automated license plate reader systems in trafficways.20250HB1125PN1253 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Requirements.--The department shall establish a permitting process for the installation of automated license plate reader systems on trafficways. The department shall:(1) Require the use of breakaway poles in areas without physical barriers.(2) Allow the installation of non-breakaway poles if the non-breakaway pole is located behind a physical barrier.(3) Allow pole installation up to 15 feet from the edge of the nearest travel lane or fog line without the presence of a curb or barrier.(4) Allow attachment to existing infrastructure provided the proper approvals are obtained from the authorities with jurisdiction or ownership over the existing infrastructure.(5) Allow third parties to submit permit applications on behalf of law enforcement agencies if the third party has obtained a letter of authorization signed by a representative of the law enforcement agency.(6) Utilize a single permit for multiple locations within the same political subdivision.(c) Review.--The department shall follow a 30-day review period for permit application.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 30 days.20250HB1125PN1253 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122